California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(B) The client or the client’s authorized agent if the receiving veterinary premises is unknown.

(c) The minimum amount of information that shall be included in written records and summaries shall be established by the board.

(d) The minimum duration of time for which a registered veterinary premises shall retain the written record or a complete copy of the written record shall be determined by the
 board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 195, Sec. 23.   (AB 1502)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4855.1.

Within 30 days of receiving a written or verbal request by the client or their authorized agent for a record of client payments, the licensee manager of the veterinary premises shall provide a record of client payments made to the veterinary premises related to services and treatment provided. A record of client payments made to the veterinary premises related to services and treatments provided shall be maintained for a minimum of three years after the animal’s last visits.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 195, Sec. 24.   (AB 1502)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4856.

(a) All records required by law to be kept by a veterinarian subject to this chapter, including, but not limited to, records pertaining to diagnosis and treatment of animals and records pertaining to drugs or devices for use on animals, shall be open to inspection by the board, or its authorized representatives, during an inspection as part of a regular inspection program by the board, or during an investigation initiated in response to a complaint that a licensee has violated any law or regulation that constitutes grounds for disciplinary action by the board. A copy of all those records shall be provided to the board immediately upon request.

(b) Equipment and drugs on the premises, or any other place, where veterinary medicine, veterinary dentistry, veterinary
 surgery, or the various branches thereof is being practiced, or otherwise in the possession of a veterinarian for purposes of that practice, shall be open to inspection by the board, or its authorized representatives, during an inspection as part of a regular inspection program by the board, or during an investigation initiated in response to a complaint that a licensee has violated any law or regulation that constitutes grounds for disciplinary action by the board.

(c) The licensee manager for the registered veterinary premises shall make any records related to the services a veterinarian has provided on behalf of the registered veterinary premises available for inspection by that veterinarian.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 195, Sec. 25.   (AB 1502)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4857.

(a) A veterinarian licensed under this chapter shall not disclose any information concerning an animal patient receiving veterinary services, the client responsible for the animal patient receiving veterinary services, or the veterinary care provided to an animal patient, except under any one of the following circumstances:

(1) Upon written or witnessed verbal authorization by knowing and informed consent of the client.

(2) Upon authorization received by electronic transmission when originated by the client.

(3) In response to a valid court order or
 subpoena.

(4) As may be required to ensure compliance with any federal, state, county, or city law or regulation, including, but not limited to, the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(5) If the care or service was for a horse that has participated in the previous year, or is intended to participate, in a licensed horse race. In these situations, the entire medical record for the horse shall be made available upon request to anyone responsible for the direct medical care of the horse, including the owner, trainer, or veterinarian, the California Horse Racing Board or any other state or local governmental entity, and the racing association or fair conducting the licensed horse race.

(6) As otherwise provided in this section.

(b) This section shall not apply to the extent that the client responsible for an animal patient or an authorized agent of the client responsible for the animal patient has filed or caused to be filed a civil or criminal complaint that places the veterinarian’s care and treatment of the animal patient or the nature and extent of the injuries to the animal patient at issue, or when the veterinarian is acting to comply with federal, state, county, or city laws or regulations.

(c) A veterinarian shall be subject to the criminal penalties set forth in Section 4831 or any other provision of this code for a violation of this section. In addition, any veterinarian who negligently
 releases confidential information shall be liable in a civil action for any damages caused by the release of that information.

(d) Nothing in this section is intended to prevent the sharing of veterinary medical information between veterinarians and peace officers, humane society officers, or animal control officers who are acting to protect the welfare of animals.

(e) Nothing in this section is intended to prevent the sharing of veterinary medical information between veterinarians and facilities for the purpose of diagnosis or treatment of the animal patient that is the subject of the medical records.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 497, Sec. 64.   (SB 1526)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.1. Continuing Education [4858. - 4858.3.]

4858.

(a) Except for the first renewal period, all holders of veterinarian licenses and veterinary technician registrations issued under the provisions of this chapter shall obtain continuing education relevant to developments in the practice of veterinary medicine.

(b) A person applying for renewal of their license or registration in active status shall certify, under penalty of perjury, that they are in compliance with this article, as applicable.

(c) The board shall have the right to audit the records of all applicants to verify the completion of the continuing education requirement. Applicants shall maintain records of completion of required continuing education coursework for a
 period of four years and shall make these records available to the board upon request for auditing purposes. If the board, during this audit, questions whether any course reported by the applicant satisfies the continuing education requirement, the applicant shall provide information to the board concerning the content of the course, course hours, and the name of its sponsor and cosponsor.

(d) An applicant may apply for an inactive license or to restore an inactive license under the provisions of Article 9 (commencing with Section 700) of Chapter 1.

(e) Notwithstanding Section 4858.1, the board, in its discretion, may exempt from the continuing education requirement an applicant who for reasons of health, military service, or undue hardship cannot meet those requirements. Applications for waivers shall be submitted on a form provided by the
 board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 195, Sec. 26.   (AB 1502)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4858.1.

(a) The board shall issue renewed veterinarian licenses only to those applicants who have completed a minimum of 36 hours of continuing education in the preceding two years.

(b) Continuing education hours for veterinarians shall be earned as follows:

(1) Attending courses relevant to veterinary medicine and sponsored or cosponsored by any of the following:

(A) The American Veterinary Medical Association (AVMA), its accredited veterinary medical colleges, or its recognized specialty or affiliated allied groups or educational organizations.

(B) State
 veterinary medical associations or their affiliated associations or educational organizations.

(C) Federal, state, or local government agencies.

(D) Providers accredited, approved, or recognized by the Accreditation Council for Continuing Medical Education (ACCME), American Medical Association (AMA), American Dental Association Continuing Education Recognition Program (ADA CERP), or American Association of Veterinary State Boards (AAVSB).

(2) A total of 6 hours or fewer of the required 36 hours of continuing education may be earned by doing either of the following, or a combination thereof:

(A) Up to six hours may be earned by taking self-study courses, which may include, but are not limited to, reading journals, viewing video recordings, or listening
 to audio recordings.

(B) Up to four hours may be earned by providing pro bono spaying or neutering services for a public animal control agency or shelter, society for the prevention of cruelty to animals shelter, humane society shelter, or rescue group in compliance with the following:

(i) The services shall be performed at a veterinary premises registered with the board pursuant to Section 4853.

(ii) Proof of completion of continuing education pursuant to this subparagraph shall be documented by the director or administrator of the public animal control agency or shelter, society for the prevention of cruelty to animals shelter, humane society shelter, or rescue group, with a copy provided to the veterinarian, and include the date of performing the spaying and neutering services, the name, address, and telephone
 number of the entity for which the spaying and neutering services were provided, and the name, address, and veterinary premises registration where the spaying and neutering services were performed.

(3) A veterinarian who teaches a course specified in subparagraphs (A) to (D), inclusive, of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) may receive continuing education credit for the course one time during a renewal period.

(4) Up to 16 hours of continuing education credit may be earned by participating as an expert in an examination preparation workshop for the national licensing examination.

(5) Up to 24 hours of continuing education credit may be earned for completing courses in business practice management or licensee mental health and wellness and its impact on the delivery of veterinary services.

(6) Up to one hour of continuing education credit may be earned by passing the Veterinary Law Examination (VLE).

(7) Up to two hours of continuing education credit may be earned by attending a board of Veterinary Medicine Multidisciplinary Advisory Committee meeting, as verified by the board.

(c) Providers offering continuing education courses pursuant to paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (b) shall comply with the requirements of Section 4858.3.

(d) For good cause, the board may adopt an order specifying, on a prospective basis, that a course provider authorized pursuant to paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (b) is no longer an acceptable provider.

(e) (1) A licensed
 veterinarian who renews their license shall complete a minimum of one credit hour of continuing education on the judicious use of medically important antimicrobial drugs every four years as part of their continuing education requirements.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, “medically important antimicrobial drug” means an antimicrobial drug listed in Appendix A of the federal Food and Drug Administration’s Guidance for Industry #152, including critically important, highly important, and important antimicrobial drugs, as that appendix may be amended.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 195, Sec. 26.   (AB 1502)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4858.2.

(a) The board shall issue renewed veterinary technician registrations only to those applicants who have completed a minimum of 20 hours of continuing education in the preceding two years.

(b) Continuing education hours for registered veterinary technicians shall be earned as follows:

(1) Attending courses provided by those specified in subparagraphs (A) to (D), inclusive, of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 4858.1 or sponsored or cosponsored by one of the following:

(A) National Association of Veterinary Technicians in America (NAVTA) recognized veterinary technician specialty organizations.

(B) State veterinary technician associations recognized by the secretary of state in that state.

(2) Up to 4 hours of the required 20 hours of continuing education may be earned by doing either of the following, or a combination thereof:

(A) Up to four hours may be earned by taking self-study courses, which may include, but are not limited to, reading journals, viewing video recordings, or listening to audio recordings.

(B) Up to two hours may be earned by performing pro bono animal health care tasks related to spaying or neutering services for a public animal control agency or shelter, society for the prevention of cruelty to animals shelter, humane society shelter, or rescue group in compliance with the following:

(i) The services shall be performed under the direct supervision of a licensed veterinarian at a veterinary premises registered with the board pursuant to Section 4853.

(ii) Proof of completion of continuing education pursuant to this subparagraph shall be documented, with a copy provided to the registered veterinary technician, by the supervising veterinarian and include the date of performance of animal health care tasks, the name, address, and telephone number of the entity for which the animal health care tasks were provided, the name and veterinarian license number of the supervising veterinarian, and the name, address, and veterinary premises registration where the animal health care tasks were performed.

(3) A registered veterinary technician who teaches a course described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) may
 receive continuing education credit for the course one time during a renewal period.

(4) Up to nine hours of continuing education credit may be earned by participating as an expert in an examination preparation workshop for the national licensing examination.

(5) Up to 13 hours of continuing education credit may be earned for completing courses in business practice management or mental health and wellness and its impact on the delivery of veterinary services.

(6) Up to one hour of continuing education credit may be earned by passing the Veterinary Law Examination.

(7) Up to two hours of continuing education credit may be earned by attending a board or Veterinary Medicine Multidisciplinary Advisory Committee meeting, as verified by the board.

(c) Providers offering continuing education courses pursuant to paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (b) shall comply with the requirements of Section 4858.3.

(d) For good cause, the board may adopt an order specifying, on a prospective basis, that a continuing education source authorized pursuant to paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (b) is no longer an acceptable source.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 195, Sec. 26.   (AB 1502)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4858.3.

(a) Upon a course attendee’s completion of a continuing education course sponsored by a provider pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 4858.1 or paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 4858.2, as applicable, the course provider shall issue to the course attendee a certificate of course completion containing the following:

(1) The name of the attendee.

(2) The course title.

(3) The provider name and address.

(4) The provider number assigned by the entity accrediting, approving, or recognizing the course provider, if applicable, and
 the name of that entity.

(5) The date of the course.

(6) The number of continuing education hours granted for the course.

(7) The signature of the course instructor, provider, or provider designee.

(b) For providers that hold continuing education events with multiple and concurrent courses, the record of course completion shall specify both of the following:

(1) The information specified in paragraphs (1) to (7), inclusive, of subdivision (a).

(2) The maximum number of hours offered at the continuing education event, accompanied by a log of the actual courses attended by the attendee. The log of courses attended shall be
 completed by either the provider or the attendee.

(c) The course provider shall maintain records related to continuing education courses provided for a period of four years from the date the course was completed. The records shall include:

(1) Syllabi or course outlines for each course.

(2) The time and location of each course.

(3) Course instructors’ curriculum vitae or resumes.

(4) Registration rosters with the names and addresses of individuals who attended the courses.

(5) A sample of the record of course completion form provided to attendees for verifying attendance.

(6) A sample of the evaluation form completed by attendees.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 195, Sec. 26.   (AB 1502)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.5. Wellness Evaluation Committees [4860. - 4873.]

4860.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the board seek ways and means to identify and rehabilitate veterinarians and registered veterinary technicians with impairment due to abuse of dangerous drugs or alcohol, affecting competency so that veterinarians and registered veterinary technicians so afflicted may be treated and returned to the practice of veterinary medicine in a manner that will not endanger the public health and safety.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 497, Sec. 65.   (SB 1526)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

4861.

(a) One or more wellness evaluation committees is hereby authorized to be established by the board. Each wellness evaluation committee shall be composed of five persons appointed by the board. The board, in making its appointments, shall give consideration to recommendations of state and local associations and shall consider, among others, where appropriate, the appointment of individuals who have recovered from impairment or who have knowledge and expertise in the management of impairment.

(b) Each wellness evaluation committee shall have the following composition:

(1) At least one veterinarian licensed under this chapter.

(2) At least
 two public members.

(3) At least one registered veterinary technician registered under this chapter.

(c) Each person appointed to a wellness evaluation committee shall have experience or knowledge in the evaluation or management of persons who are impaired due to alcohol or drug abuse.

(d) It shall require the majority vote of the board to appoint a person to a wellness evaluation committee. Each appointment shall be at the pleasure of the board for a term not to exceed four years. In its discretion the board may stagger the terms of the initial members appointed.

(e) The board president may suspend any wellness evaluation committee member pending an investigation into allegations of existing alcohol or drug addiction. If, after investigation, there is
 evidence of an alcohol or drug addiction relapse, the board president shall have authorized discretion to remove the member without input from the board.

(f) The board may appoint a program director and other personnel as necessary to carry out this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 510, Sec. 57.   (SB 887)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

4862.

Each member of a wellness evaluation committee shall receive per diem and expenses as provided in Section 103.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 631, Sec. 26.   (AB 1535)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4863.

Three members of a wellness evaluation committee shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business at any meeting. Any action requires the majority vote of the wellness evaluation committee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 631, Sec. 27.   (AB 1535)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4864.

Each wellness evaluation committee shall elect from its membership a chairperson and a vice chairperson.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 631, Sec. 28.   (AB 1535)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4865.

The board shall administer the provisions of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 870, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

4866.

(a) The board shall establish criteria for the acceptance, denial, or termination of veterinarians and registered veterinary technicians in a wellness program. Only those veterinarians and registered veterinary technicians who have voluntarily requested wellness treatment and supervision by a
 wellness evaluation committee shall participate in a program.

(b) The board shall establish criteria for the selection of administrative physicians who shall examine veterinarians and registered veterinary technicians requesting wellness under a program. Any reports made under this article by the administrative physician shall constitute an exception to Sections 994 and 995 of the Evidence Code.

(c) The wellness program may accept no more
 than 100 participants who are licensees of the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 631, Sec. 29.   (AB 1535)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4867.

The wellness evaluation committee shall inform each veterinarian and registered veterinary technician who requests participation in a program of the procedures followed in the program, of the rights and responsibilities of the veterinarian and registered veterinary technician in the program, and of the possible results of noncompliance with the program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 631, Sec. 30.   (AB 1535)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4868.

Each wellness evaluation committee shall have the following duties and responsibilities:

(a) To evaluate those veterinarians and registered veterinary technicians who request participation in the program according to the guidelines prescribed by the board and to consider the recommendation of the administrative physician on the admission of the veterinarian or registered veterinary technician to the
 wellness program.

(b) To review and designate those treatment facilities to which veterinarians and registered veterinary technicians in a wellness program may be referred.

(c) To receive and review information concerning veterinarians and registered veterinary technicians participating in the program.

(d) To call meetings as necessary to consider the requests of veterinarians and registered veterinary technicians to participate in a
 wellness program, and to consider reports regarding veterinarians and registered veterinary technicians participating in a program from an administrative physician, or from others.

(e) To consider in the case of each veterinarian and registered veterinary technician participating in a program whether they may with safety continue or resume the practice of veterinary medicine or the assisting in the practice of veterinary medicine.

(f) To set forth in writing for each veterinarian and registered veterinary technician participating in a program a treatment program established for each such veterinarian and registered veterinary technician
 with the requirements for supervision and surveillance.

(g) To hold a general meeting at least twice a year, which shall be open and public, to evaluate the program’s progress, to review data as required in reports to the board, to prepare reports to be submitted to the board, and to suggest proposals for changes in the
 wellness program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 631, Sec. 31.   (AB 1535)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4869.

Notwithstanding Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, relating to public meetings, a wellness evaluation committee may convene in closed session to consider reports pertaining to any veterinarian or registered veterinary technician requesting or participating in a
 wellness program. A
 wellness evaluation committee shall only convene in closed session to the extent that it is necessary to protect the privacy of a veterinarian or registered veterinary technician.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 631, Sec. 32.   (AB 1535)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4870.

Each veterinarian and registered veterinary technician who requests participation in a wellness program shall agree to cooperate with the treatment program designed by a wellness evaluation committee. Any failure to comply with the provisions of a treatment program may result in termination of the veterinarian’s or registered veterinary technician’s participation in a
 program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 631, Sec. 33.   (AB 1535)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4871.

(a) After a wellness evaluation committee in its discretion has determined that a veterinarian or registered veterinary technician has been rehabilitated and the wellness program is completed, the wellness
 evaluation committee shall purge and destroy all records pertaining to the veterinarian’s or registered veterinary technician’s participation in a wellness program.

(b) All board and wellness evaluation committee records and records of proceedings pertaining to the treatment of a veterinarian or registered veterinary technician in a program shall be kept confidential and are not subject to discovery or subpoena.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 631, Sec. 34.   (AB 1535)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4872.

The board shall provide for the representation of any persons making reports to a wellness evaluation committee or the board under this article in any action for defamation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 631, Sec. 35.   (AB 1535)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4873.

The board shall charge each veterinarian and registered veterinary technician who is accepted to participate in the wellness program a wellness program registration fee and reasonable administrative fees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 631, Sec. 36.   (AB 1535)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Revocation and Suspension [4875. - 4887.]

4875.

In addition to its authority to suspend or revoke a license, registration, or permit, the board shall have the authority to assess a fine not in excess of five thousand dollars ($5,000) against a licensee, registrant, or permitholder for any of the causes specified in Section 4883. A fine may be assessed in lieu of or in addition to a suspension or revocation. Notwithstanding Section 4903, all fines collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited to the credit of the California Veterinary Medical Board Contingent Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 195, Sec. 27.   (AB 1502)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4875.1.

(a) In order to ensure that its resources are maximized for the protection of the public, the board shall prioritize its investigative and prosecutorial resources to ensure that individuals representing the greatest threat of harm are identified and disciplined expeditiously. Cases involving any of the following allegations shall be handled on a priority basis, as follows, with the highest priority being given to cases in paragraph (1):

(1) Negligence or incompetence that involves death or serious bodily injury to an animal patient, such that the individual represents a danger to the public.

(2) Cruelty to animals.

(3) A conviction or
 convictions for a criminal charge or charges or being subject to a felony criminal proceeding without consideration of the outcome of the proceeding.

(4) Practicing veterinary medicine while under the influence of drugs or alcohol.

(5) Drug or alcohol abuse by an individual involving death or serious bodily injury to an animal patient or to the public.

(6) Self-prescribing of any dangerous drug, as defined in Section 4022, or any controlled substance, as defined in Section 4021.

(7) Repeated acts of excessive prescribing, furnishing, or administering of controlled substances, as defined in Section 4021, or repeated acts of prescribing, dispensing, or furnishing of controlled substances, as defined in Section 4021, without having first established a
 veterinarian-client-patient relationship pursuant to Section 4826.6.

(8) Extreme departures from minimum sanitary conditions such that there is a threat to an animal patient or the public and animal health and safety, only if the case has already been subject to Section 494 and board action.

(b) The board may prioritize cases involving an allegation of conduct that is not described in subdivision (a). Those cases prioritized shall not be assigned a priority equal to or higher than the priorities established in subdivision (a).

(c) The board shall annually report and make publicly available the number of disciplinary actions that are taken in each priority category specified in subdivisions (a) and (b).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 195, Sec. 28.   (AB 1502)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4875.2.

If, upon completion of an investigation, the executive officer has probable cause to believe that a veterinarian, registered veterinary technician, veterinary assistant controlled substance permitholder, or veterinary premises registration holder has violated provisions of this chapter, the executive officer may issue a citation to the veterinarian, registered veterinary technician, veterinary assistant controlled substance permitholder, or veterinary premises registration holder in accordance with Section 125.9 and the board’s regulations established pursuant thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 195, Sec. 29.   (AB 1502)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4875.3.

If the board determines, as a result of its inspection of the premises pursuant to Section 4809.5, or any other place where veterinary medicine, veterinary dentistry, veterinary surgery, or the various branches thereof is practiced, or that is otherwise in the possession of a veterinarian for purpose of that practice, that it is not in compliance with the standards established by the board, the board shall provide a notice of any deficiencies and provide a reasonable time for compliance with those standards prior to commencing any further action pursuant to this article. The board may issue an interim suspension order pursuant to Section 494 in those cases where the violations represent an immediate threat to the public and animal health and safety.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 510, Sec. 58.   (SB 887)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

4875.4.

(a) The board shall, in the manner prescribed in Section 4808, adopt regulations covering the assessment of civil penalties under this article which give due consideration to the appropriateness of the penalty with respect to the following factors:

(1) The gravity of the violation, including, but not limited to, whether the violation is minor.

(2) The good faith of the person being charged.

(3) The history of previous violations.

(b) In no event shall the civil penalty for each citation issued be assessed in an amount greater than five thousand dollars ($5,000).

(c) Regulations adopted by the board shall be pursuant to the procedures for citations and fines in accordance with Section 125.9.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 529, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

4875.6.

(a) In addition to requesting an administrative hearing as provided for in paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 125.9, the cited person may request an informal conference to review the acts shared in the citation. The cited person shall make the request for an informal conference in writing, within 30 days of the date of issuance of the citation, to the executive officer.

(b) The executive officer or their designee shall hold, within 60 days from the receipt of the request, an informal conference with the cited person. The executive officer or their designee may extend the 60-day period for good cause.

(c) Following the informal conference, the executive officer or their designee may affirm, modify, or dismiss the citation, including any fine that is levied, order of abatement, or order of correction issued. The executive officer or their designee shall state in writing the reasons for the action and transmit a copy of those findings to the cited person within 30 days after the informal conference.

(d) If the citation, including any fine that is levied, order of abatement, or order of correction, is affirmed or modified following the informal conference, the respondent may make a request in writing to the executive officer within 30 days of the affirmed or modified citation, for a formal hearing, which shall be conducted as provided in paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 125.9.

(e) A cited person shall not request an informal conference for a citation that has been affirmed or modified following an informal
 conference.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 631, Sec. 39.   (AB 1535)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4875.7.

(a) Notwithstanding paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 125.9 and Section 148, the executive officer may issue a citation to a person or entity, and that person or entity shall be subject to an administrative fine of no less than two thousand dollars ($2,000) and not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each violation of practicing or offering to practice veterinary medicine without a license, registration, or permit issued by the board pursuant to this chapter. The maximum fine for unlicensed activity is separate and not inclusive of fines for other violations.

(b) Administrative fines collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited in accordance with Section 4903.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 195, Sec. 30.   (AB 1502)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4882.

(a) The proceedings under this article shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the board shall have the powers granted therein.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (b) of Section 11415.60 of the Government Code, a licensee, registrant, or permitholder may enter into a settlement to resolve an administrative action, including through license, registration, or permit surrender, suspension or revocation, or placing the license, registration, or permit on probation, instead of a commencement of proceedings pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. That settlement shall be subject to
 board approval or a counteroffer of terms of the settlement action. At any time prior to the issuance of a decision and order by the board adopting the settlement, the licensee, registrant, or permitholder may withdraw the settlement and request a commencement of proceedings pursuant to subdivision (a). The decision and order adopting the settlement shall be considered discipline and shall be posted on the board’s internet website.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 195, Sec. 33.   (AB 1502)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4883.

The board may deny, revoke, suspend, or place on probation a license, registration, or permit or assess a fine as provided in Section 4875 for any of the following:

(a) Conviction of a crime substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of veterinary medicine, surgery, or dentistry, in which case the record of the conviction shall be conclusive evidence.

(b) For having professional connection with, or lending the
 licensee’s, registrant’s, or permitholder’s name to, any illegal practitioner of veterinary medicine and the various branches thereof.

(c) Violation or attempting to violate, directly or indirectly, any of the provisions of this chapter.

(d) Fraud or dishonesty in applying, treating, or reporting on tuberculin or other biological tests.

(e) Employment of anyone but a veterinarian licensed in the state to demonstrate the use of biologics in the treatment of animals.

(f) False or misleading advertising.

(g) Unprofessional conduct, that includes, but is not limited to, the following:

(1) Conviction of a charge of violating any federal statutes or rules or any statute or rule of this state regulating dangerous drugs or controlled substances. The record of the conviction is conclusive evidence thereof. A plea or verdict of guilty or a conviction following a plea of nolo contendere is deemed to be a conviction within the meaning of this section. The board may order the license, registration, or permit to be suspended or revoked, or assess a fine, or decline to issue a license, registration, or permit when the time for appeal has elapsed, or the judgment
 of conviction has been affirmed on appeal or when an order granting probation is made suspending the imposition of sentence, irrespective of a subsequent order under Section 1203.4, 1210.1, or 3063.1 of the Penal Code allowing the person to withdraw a plea of guilty and to enter a plea of not guilty, or setting aside the verdict of guilty, or dismissing the accusation, information, or indictment.

(2) (A) The use of, or prescribing for or administering to oneself, any controlled substance.

(B) The use of any of the dangerous drugs specified in Section 4022, or of alcoholic beverages to the extent, or in any manner as to be dangerous or injurious to a person
 issued a license, registration, or permit under this chapter, or to any other person or to the public, or to the extent that the use impairs the ability of the licensee, registrant, or permitholder to conduct with safety the practice authorized by the license, registration, or permit.

(C) The conviction of more than one misdemeanor or any felony involving the use, consumption, or self-administration of any of the substances referred to in this section or any
 combination thereof, and the record of the conviction is conclusive evidence.

A plea or verdict of guilty or a conviction following a plea of nolo contendere is deemed to be a conviction within the meaning of this section. The board may order the
 license, registration, or permit to be suspended or revoked or assess a fine, or may decline to issue a license, registration, or permit when the time for appeal has elapsed or the judgment of conviction has been affirmed on appeal or when an order granting probation is made suspending imposition of sentence, irrespective of a subsequent order under Section 1203.4, 1210.1, or 3063.1 of the Penal Code allowing the person to withdraw a plea of guilty and to enter a plea of not guilty, or setting aside the verdict of guilty, or dismissing the accusation, information, or indictment.

(3) A violation of any federal statute, rule, or regulation or any of the statutes, rules, or regulations of
 this state regulating dangerous
 drugs, including antimicrobial drugs in animal feed, or controlled substances.
